Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
FISHING RIGHTS

§187A-21 Public fishing grounds.
Except as otherwise provided by law, all fishing grounds appertaining to any
government land or otherwise belonging to the government, except ponds, shall
be and are forever granted to the people, for the free and equal use by all
persons; provided that for the protection of these fishing grounds, the
department may manage and regulate the taking of aquatic life. [L 1985, c 94,
pt of §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Protecting Hawai‘i's
Fisheries: Creating an Effective Regulatory Scheme to Sustain Hawai‘i's Fish
Stocks. 29 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next